South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3470.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 17, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-17-35.  (A)(1) No later than July 1, 2027, the area of each county of this State must be constituted as a school district and a county may not have multiple school districts within its boundaries. The General Assembly shall provide for the governance, fiscal authority, and administrative and operational responsibilities for a countywide school district if no provisions of law apply following the creation of the countywide school district as required in this section. (B) Upon the effective date of this act, school districts that need to consolidate to establish a countywide school district as described in subsection (A) must begin all prudent and essential preparations to achieve an efficient and well-organized consolidation. SECTION 2.  Chapter 17, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-17-36.  No later than July 1, 2032, countywide school districts must be consolidated into school districts as follows: (1) Anderson County, Oconee County, and Pickens County; (2) Berkley County, Charleston County, and Dorchester County; (3) Chesterfield County, Dillon County, and Marlboro County; (4) Allendale County, Bamberg County, and Barnwell County; (5) Darlington County, Florence County, and Marion County; (6) Georgetown County and Horry County; (7) Beaufort County, Colleton County, Hampton County, and Jasper County; (8) Calhoun County and Orangeburg County; (9) Cherokee County, Spartanburg County, and Union County; (10) Abbeville County, Edgefield County, Greenwood County, Laurens County, McCormick County, Newberry County, and Saluda County; (11) Chester County, Lancaster County, and York County; (12) Clarendon County, Kershaw County, Lee County, and Sumter County; (13) Greenville County; (14) Aiken County; (15) Fairfield County, Lexington County, and Richland County; (16) Williamsburg County. The General Assembly shall provide for the governance, fiscal authority, and administrative and operational responsibilities for a school district if no provisions of law apply following the creation of the school district as required in this section. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----